West Virginia, session 2025, SB380.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Dentistry. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-4-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Dentistry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 15, 2024, relating to the Board of Dentistry (continuing education requirements, 5 CSR 11), is authorized.